New Jersey, session 221, A560.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 16 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-16) is amended to read as follows: 16.  A transportation network company shall require an applicant, as defined in section 2 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-2), to submit a transportation network company driver application to the transportation network company.  The application shall include the applicant's address, age, and social security number, a copy of the applicant's driver's license, motor vehicle registration, and automobile liability insurance, and any other information required by the transportation network company. Prior to approval of an applicant, a transportation network company shall provide an applicant with an anti-human trafficking training course approved by the Attorney General and require the applicant to complete the course.  The training course may be provided via web based video or digital format and shall include:  an overview of human trafficking, including how human trafficking is defined; guidance on the role transportation network company drivers play in reporting and responding to human trafficking; and information on how to report suspected human trafficking. (cf: P.L.2017, c.26, s.16) 2.    (New Section)  Within 90 days of the effective date of this act, each transportation network company shall provide each transportation network company driver with an anti-human trafficking training course approved by the Attorney General and require the applicant to complete the course.  The training course may be provided via web based video or digital format and shall include:  an overview of human trafficking, including how human trafficking is defined; guidance on the role transportation network company drivers play in reporting and responding to human trafficking; and information on how to report suspected human trafficking. Upon completion of an anti-human trafficking training course, the driver shall certify to any transportation network company whose digital network the driver uses that the driver completed an anti-human trafficking training course approved by the Attorney General.  If a driver fails to provide a transportation network company with the certification required pursuant to this section, the transportation network company shall prohibit the driver from utilizing its digital network to provide rides until the driver submits the certification required pursuant to this section. On the 91st day following the effective date of this act, each transportation network company shall create a list of drivers who did not provide the certification required pursuant to this section by the required date.  Completion of the anti-human trafficking training course, or failure to complete the course, shall be noted in the individual record of each transportation network company driver required to be maintained pursuant to section 25 of P.L.2017, c.26 (C.39:5H-25). 3.    This act shall take effect on the 60th day following enactment, except that the Attorney General shall take such administrative action as may be necessary in advance of that date to ensure the timely implementation of this act.